Florida, session 2026, SB686.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 163.3162, Florida 43 Statutes, is amended to read: 44 163.3162âAgricultural lands and practices.â 45 (4)âPUBLIC HEARING PROCESS.â 46 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law or local ordinance, 47 resolution, or regulation, the owner of a parcel or parcels of 48 land, or such ownerâs authorized agent or controlling entity, 49 may apply to the governing body of the local government for 50 certification of the parcel or parcels as an agricultural 51 enclave as defined in s. 163.3164 if one or more adjacent 52 parcels or an adjacent development permits the same density as, 53 or higher density than, the proposed development. An applicant 54 seeking such certification may not use the perimeter of another 55 parcel certified by the local government as an agricultural 56 enclave to meet the definition of the term âagricultural 57 enclave.â 58 (b)âWithin 30 days after the local governmentâs receipt of 59 such an application, the local government shall provide to the 60 applicant a written report detailing whether the application 61 complies with the requirements of paragraph (a). 62 (c)âWithin 30 days after the local government provides the 63 report required under paragraph (b), the local government shall 64 hold a public hearing to approve or deny certification of the 65 parcel or parcels as an agricultural enclave. If the local 66 government does not approve or deny certification of the parcel 67 or parcels as an agricultural enclave within 90 days after 68 receipt of the application, the parcel or parcels must be 69 certified as an agricultural enclave. 70 (d)âIf the application is denied, the governing body of the 71 local government must issue its decision in writing with 72 detailed findings of fact and conclusions of law. The applicant 73 may seek review of the denial by filing a petition for writ of 74 certiorari in the circuit court within 30 days after the date 75 the local government renders its decision. 76 (e)âIf the application is approved, the owner of the parcel 77 or parcels certified as an agricultural enclave, or the ownerâs 78 authorized agent or controlling entity, may submit development 79 plans for single-family residential housing which are consistent 80 with the land use requirements, or future land use designations, 81 including uses, density, and intensity, of one or more adjacent 82 parcels or an adjacent development. A development for which 83 plans are submitted under this paragraph must be treated as a 84 conforming use, notwithstanding the local governmentâs 85 comprehensive plan, future land use designation, or zoning. If 86 development within an agricultural enclave affects an 87 established wildlife corridor, the local government is 88 encouraged to incorporate site design measures that maintain 89 habitat permeability, including clustering, open space 90 retention, and wildlife crossing accommodations, where feasible. 91 (f)âA local government may not enact or enforce a law or 92 regulation for an agricultural enclave which is more burdensome 93 than for other types of applications for comparable uses or 94 densities. A local government shall treat an agricultural 95 enclave that is adjacent to an urban service district as if such 96 enclave is within the urban service district. 97 (g)âWithin 30 business days after the local governmentâs 98 receipt of development plans under paragraph (e), the local 99 government and the owner of the parcel or parcels certified as 100 an agricultural enclave must agree in writing to a process and 101 schedule for information submittal, analysis, and final 102 approval, which may be administrative in nature, of the 103 development plans. The local government may not require the 104 owner to agree to a process that is longer than 180 days in 105 duration or that includes further review of the plans in a 106 quasi-judicial process or public hearing. 107 (h)âNotwithstanding paragraph (e), a parcel or parcels 108 certified as an agricultural enclave as defined in s. 109 163.3164(4)(c)1.c. which are adjacent to an interstate highway 110 may be developed for commercial, industrial, or single-family 111 residential purposes if one or more adjacent parcels or an 112 adjacent development permits the same density or intensity as 113 the proposed development AMENDMENT TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT 114 COMPREHENSIVE PLAN.âThe owner of a parcel of land defined as an 115 agricultural enclave under s. 163.3164 may apply for an 116 amendment to the local government comprehensive plan pursuant to 117 s. 163.3184. Such amendment is presumed not to be urban sprawl 118 as defined in s. 163.3164 if it includes land uses and 119 intensities of use that are consistent with the uses and 120 intensities of use of the industrial, commercial, or residential 121 areas that surround the parcel. This presumption may be rebutted 122 by clear and convincing evidence. Each application for a 123 comprehensive plan amendment under this subsection for a parcel 124 larger than 640 acres must include appropriate new urbanism 125 concepts such as clustering, mixed-use development, the creation 126 of rural village and city centers, and the transfer of 127 development rights in order to discourage urban sprawl while 128 protecting landowner rights. 129 (a)âThe local government and the owner of a parcel of land 130 that is the subject of an application for an amendment shall 131 have 180 days following the date that the local government 132 receives a complete application to negotiate in good faith to 133 reach consensus on the land uses and intensities of use that are 134 consistent with the uses and intensities of use of the 135 industrial, commercial, or residential areas that surround the 136 parcel. Within 30 days after the local governmentâs receipt of 137 such an application, the local government and owner must agree 138 in writing to a schedule for information submittal, public 139 hearings, negotiations, and final action on the amendment, which 140 schedule may thereafter be altered only with the written consent 141 of the local government and the owner. Compliance with the 142 schedule in the written agreement constitutes good faith 143 negotiations for purposes of paragraph (c). 144 (b)âUpon conclusion of good faith negotiations under 145 paragraph (a), regardless of whether the local government and 146 owner reach consensus on the land uses and intensities of use 147 that are consistent with the uses and intensities of use of the 148 industrial, commercial, or residential areas that surround the 149 parcel, the amendment must be transmitted to the state land 150 planning agency for review pursuant to s. 163.3184. If the local 151 government fails to transmit the amendment within 180 days after 152 receipt of a complete application, the amendment must be 153 immediately transferred to the state land planning agency for 154 such review. A plan amendment transmitted to the state land 155 planning agency submitted under this subsection is presumed not 156 to be urban sprawl as defined in s. 163.3164. This presumption 157 may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence. 158 (c)âIf the owner fails to negotiate in good faith, a plan 159 amendment submitted under this subsection is not entitled to the 160 rebuttable presumption under this subsection in the negotiation 161 and amendment process. 162 (i)(d)âNothing within this subsection relating to 163 agricultural enclaves shall preempt or replace any protection 164 currently existing for any property located within the 165 boundaries of any of the following areas: 166 1.âThe Wekiva Study Area, as described in s. 369.316.; or 167 2.âThe Everglades Protection Area, as defined in s. 168 373.4592(2). 169 3.âAny area of critical state concern, as designated in s. 170 380.055, s. 380.0551, s. 380.0552, s. 380.0553, or s. 380.0555. 171 4.âAny portion of a property encumbered by a recorded 172 conservation easement as defined in s. 704.06. 173 5.âA military installation or range identified in s. 174 163.3175(2). 175 Section 2.âSubsection (4) of section 163.3164, Florida 176 Statutes, is amended to read: 177 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 178 this act: 179 (4)ââAgricultural enclaveâ means an unincorporated, 180 undeveloped parcel or parcels that, as of January 1, 2025: 181 (a)âAre Is owned or controlled by a single person or 182 entity; 183 (b)âHave Has been in continuous use for bona fide 184 agricultural purposes, as defined by s. 193.461, for a period of 185 5 years before prior to the date of any comprehensive plan 186 amendment or development application; 187 (c)1.âAre Is surrounded on at least 75 percent of their its 188 perimeter by: 189 a.1.âA parcel or parcels Property that have has existing 190 industrial, commercial, or residential development; or 191 b.2.âA parcel or parcels Property that the local government 192 has designated, in the local governmentâs comprehensive plan, 193 zoning map, and future land use map, as land that is to be 194 developed for industrial, commercial, or residential purposes, 195 and at least 50 75 percent of such parcel or parcels property is 196 existing industrial, commercial, or residential development; or 197 c.âA combination of an interstate highway and a parcel or 198 parcels that are within an urban service district, area, or line 199 and that the local government has designated in the local 200 governmentâs future land use map as land that is to be developed 201 for industrial, commercial, or residential purposes; 202 2.âDo not exceed 700 acres and are surrounded on at least 203 50 percent of their perimeter by a parcel or parcels that the 204 local government has designated on the local governmentâs future 205 land use map as land that is to be developed for industrial, 206 commercial, or residential purposes; and the parcel or parcels 207 are surrounded on at least 50 percent of their perimeter by a 208 parcel or parcels within an urban service district, area, or 209 line; or 210 3.âAre located within the boundary of an established rural 211 study area adopted in the local governmentâs comprehensive plan 212 which was intended to be developed with residential uses; 213 (d)âHave Has public services, including water, wastewater, 214 transportation, schools, and recreation facilities, available or 215 such public services are scheduled in the capital improvement 216 element to be provided by the local government or can be 217 provided by an alternative provider of local government 218 infrastructure in order to ensure consistency with applicable 219 concurrency provisions of s. 163.3180, or the applicant offers 220 to enter into a binding agreement to pay for, construct, or 221 contribute land for its proportionate share of such 222 improvements; and 223 (e)âDo Does not exceed 1,280 acres; however, if the parcel 224 or parcels are property is surrounded on at least 75 percent of 225 their perimeter by existing or authorized residential 226 development that will result in a density at buildout of at 227 least 1,000 residents per square mile, then the area must shall 228 be determined to be urban and the parcel or parcels may not 229 exceed 4,480 acres, unless such parcel or parcels exceeding 230 1,280 acres are within the affected counties covered by the 231 water protection plan specified in s. 373.4595(4)(c); and 232 (f)âAre located within a county with a population of 1.75 233 million or less. For purposes of this subsection, population is 234 determined in accordance with the most recent official estimate 235 pursuant to s. 186.901. 236 237 Where a right-of-way, body of water, or canal exists along the 238 perimeter of a parcel, the perimeter calculations of the 239 agricultural enclave must be based on the adjacent parcel or 240 parcels across the right-of-way, body of water, or canal. 241 Section 3.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 242 163.3162(4) and 163.3164(4), Florida Statutes, shall expire 243 January 1, 2028, and the text of those subsections shall revert 244 to that in existence on June 30, 2026, except that any amendment 245 to such text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved 246 and continue to operate to the extent that such amendment is not 247 dependent upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to 248 this section. 249 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.